Utah statutes.
41-6a-708.   Signs and markings on roadway -- No-passing zones -- Exceptions.

(1) (a)  A highway authority may designate no-passing zones on any portion of a highway under its jurisdiction if the highway authority determines passing is especially hazardous.

(b)  A highway authority shall designate a no-passing zone under Subsection (1)(a) by placing appropriate traffic-control devices on the highway.

(2) A person operating a vehicle may not drive on the left side of:

(a)  the roadway within the no-passing zone; or

(b)  any pavement striping designed to mark the no-passing zone.

(3)  Subsection (2) does not apply:

(a)  under the conditions described under Subsection 41-6a-701(1)(b); or

(b)  to a person operating a vehicle turning left onto or from an alley, private road, or driveway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

